Hawaii statutes.
§195D-24 Confidentiality. All
information submitted to the board by a landowner pursuant to section 195D-21
or 195D-22, in the course of preparing a habitat conservation plan or safe
harbor agreement for private lands, respectively, shall be kept confidential
until notice of the proposed plan or agreement is published in the periodic
bulletins of the office of environmental quality control. For habitat
conservation plans or safe harbor agreements for private lands, the precise
location of any threatened or endangered species may remain confidential. [L
1997, c 380, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 35, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next